Tennessee, session 114, SB2481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1107(b), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) days" and substituting "ten (10) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2481
012259
- 1 -